Illinois, session 104th, HB3303.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 529-21 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/29-21 new)7    Sec. 29-21. Disclosure of digitally altered content.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Deepfake" means any video recording, motion-picture film, 10sound recording, electronic image, or photograph, or any 11technological representation of speech or conduct 12substantially derivative of any one or more of those forms of 13media:14        (1) that is so realistic that a reasonable person 15    would believe it depicts speech or conduct of an 16    individual who did not in fact engage in such speech or 17    conduct; and18        (2) the production of which was substantially 19    dependent upon technical means rather than the ability of 20    another individual to physically or verbally impersonate 21    the depicted individual.22    "Depicted individual" means an individual in a deepfake 23who appears to be engaging in speech or conduct in which the   HB3303- 2 -LRB104 11023 SPS 21105 b1individual did not engage.2    (b) Except as provided in subsection (b), a person shall 3not distribute, or enter into an agreement with another person 4to distribute, materially deceptive media if:5        (1) the person knows the media falsely represents a 6    depicted individual;7        (2) the distribution occurs within 90 days before an 8    election;9        (3) the person intends the distribution to harm the 10    reputation or electoral prospects of a candidate in an 11    election and the distribution is reasonably likely to 12    cause that result; and13        (4) the person intends the distribution to change the 14    voting behavior of electors in an election by deceiving 15    the electors into incorrectly believing that the depicted 16    individual in fact engaged in the speech or conduct 17    depicted, and the distribution is reasonably likely to 18    cause that result.19    (c) The prohibition described in subsection (b) does not 20apply:21        (1) If the media includes a disclaimer informing the 22    viewer that the media has been manipulated by technical 23    means and depicts speech or conduct that did not occur. 24    The following disclaimer is sufficient, but not necessary, 25    to satisfy the requirement of this subsection:26        "This (insert image, audio, or video) has been   HB3303- 3 -LRB104 11023 SPS 21105 b1    manipulated by technical means and depicts speech or 2    conduct that did not occur."3        (2) If the media is a video, the disclaimer satisfies 4    all of the following requirements:5            (A) it appears throughout the entirety of the 6        video;7            (B) it is clearly visible to and readable by an 8        observer;9            (C) it is in letters at least as large as the 10        majority of any text communication, or if there is no 11        other text communication, in a size that is easily 12        readable by the average viewer; and13            (D) it is in the same language as the language used 14        in the video media.15        (3) If the media consists only of audio and contains 16    no image or video, the disclaimer is read at the beginning 17    and end of the media in a clearly spoken manner, in a pitch 18    that can be easily heard by the average listener, and in 19    the same language as the audio media.20        (4) If the media is an image, the disclaimer meets all 21    of the following requirements:22            (A) it is clearly visible to and readable by the 23        average viewer;24            (B) it is in letters at least as large as the 25        majority of the other text, if the media contains 26        other text; and  HB3303- 4 -LRB104 11023 SPS 21105 b1            (C) it is in the same language as the language used 2        in the image media.3        (5) If the media includes a citation directing the 4    viewer or listener to the original source from which the 5    unedited version of the existing image, audio, or video 6    was obtained, if the media was generated by editing an 7    existing image, audio, or video.8    (d) A candidate whose appearance, action, or speech is 9depicted through the use of a deceptive and fraudulent 10deepfake in violation of subsection (b) may seek injunctive or 11other equitable relief prohibiting the publication of such 12deceptive and fraudulent deepfake.13    (d) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a 14person who violates subsection (b) commits a Class C 15misdemeanor.16    A person who violates subsection (b) with the intent to 17cause violence or bodily harm commits a Class A misdemeanor.18    A person who violates subsection (b) a second or 19subsequent time within 5 years after a prior conviction for 20violating subsection (b) commits a Class 3 felony.21    (e) This Section does not apply to:22        (1) a radio or television broadcasting station, 23    including a cable or satellite television operator, 24    programmer, or producer, that broadcasts a deceptive and 25    fraudulent deepfake prohibited by this Section as part of 26    a bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary, or   HB3303- 5 -LRB104 11023 SPS 21105 b1    on-the-spot coverage of bona fide news events, if the 2    broadcast clearly acknowledges through content or a 3    disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or read by 4    the average listener or viewer, that there are questions 5    about the authenticity of the materially deceptive audio 6    or visual media; 7        (2) a radio or television broadcasting station, 8    including a cable or satellite television operator, 9    programmer, or producer, when it is paid to broadcast a 10    deceptive and fraudulent deepfake and has made a good 11    faith effort to establish the depiction is not a deceptive 12    and fraudulent deepfake;13        (3) a website, or a regularly published newspaper, 14    magazine, or other periodical of general circulation, 15    including an Internet or electronic publication, that 16    routinely carries news and commentary of general interest, 17    and that publishes materially deceptive audio or visual 18    media prohibited by this Section, if the publication 19    clearly states that the materially deceptive audio or 20    visual media does not accurately represent the speech or 21    conduct of the candidate; or22        (4) materially deceptive audio or visual media that 23    constitutes satire or parody.24    (f) The provisions of this Section are severable under 25Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB3303- 6 -LRB104 11023 SPS 21105 b1becoming law.